Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1815
Road over private property; leaving gates open; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person traveling upon a road provided for in section 39-1814 to leave the gates open when he shall have passed through the same. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 15, p. 557;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 218.